Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.090

Statement of charge—Request for hearing.

(1) If the disciplining authority determines, upon investigation, that there is reason to believe a violation of RCW 18.130.180 has occurred, a statement of charge or charges shall be prepared and served upon the license holder or applicant at the earliest practical time. The statement of charge or charges shall be accompanied by a notice that the license holder or applicant may request a hearing to contest the charge or charges. The license holder or applicant must file a request for hearing with the disciplining authority within twenty days after being served the statement of charges. If the twenty-day limit results in a hardship upon the license holder or applicant, he or she may request for good cause an extension not to exceed sixty additional days. If the disciplining authority finds that there is good cause, it shall grant the extension. The failure to request a hearing constitutes a default, whereupon the disciplining authority may enter a decision on the basis of the facts available to it.

(2) If a hearing is requested, the time of the hearing shall be fixed by the disciplining authority as soon as convenient, but the hearing shall not be held earlier than thirty days after service of the charges upon the license holder or applicant.

[ 1993 c 367 s 1; 1986 c 259 s 6; 1984 c 279 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.